Hawaii statutes.
[§624D-5] Deposition, production, and
inspection. Rules 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 34(c), and 45 of the Hawaii
rules of civil procedure shall apply to subpoenas issued under section 624D‑3.
[L 2012, c 17, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next